California statutes. Fish and Game Code
That portion of District 19 consisting of land and ocean waters bounded by the line of mean high tide of the Pacific Ocean extending into and including the state waters of the State of California for a distance of 600 feet below low-tide mark, in the San Pedro area of the City of Los Angeles in an area generally parallel to the shoreline lying between the easterly extension of 40th Street, westerly to the southerly extension of Gaffey Street at Point Fermin.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 693.)
-------------------------------------------

10911.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Niguel Marine Life Refuge: That portion of California state tide and submerged lands bounded by a line commencing at a point which is the intersection of the line of mean high tide and a line which is 2,440 feet south of and parallel to the north line of Fractional Section 21, R.8W., T.8S., S.B.M., such point also being on the north boundary of the Dana Point Marine Life Refuge, thence along the mean high tide line northerly and westerly 12,000 feet more or less to its intersection with the westerly prolongation of the most northerly boundary line of lot 101 of “Three Arches Palisades No. 1” as shown on a map filed in book 3, page 3, Records of Surveys in the Office of the County Recorder, Orange County; thence, S. 89° 54´ W. 1,200 feet from such point of intersection along the westerly prolongation of such northerly boundary line; thence, south and west, and east parallel to and 1,200 feet from the line of mean high tide to a point on the north line of Dana Point Marine Life Refuge and also being 1,200 feet west of the point of beginning; thence, east 1,200 feet along the northerly boundary of Dana Point Marine Life Refuge to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 492.)
-------------------------------------------

10912.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated as the Irvine Coast Marine Life Refuge:

That portion of California state tide and submerged lands adjoining the Newport Beach Marine Life Refuge as described in Section 10905 and bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the southwesterly extension of lot 141, Tract No. 3357 as shown on a map recorded in Book 107, Page 1 of Miscellaneous Maps on file in the office of the County Recorder, Orange County and the Line of Ordinary High Tide; thence, southeasterly along the Line of Ordinary High Tide approximately 20,000 feet to its intersection with the southwesterly extension of the northwesterly boundary line of the City of Laguna Beach; thence, southwesterly along such southwesterly extension 600 feet; thence, northwesterly along a line parallel to and 600 feet southwesterly of the Line of Ordinary High Tide to the southwesterly extension of said lot 141; thence, northeasterly 600 feet along such southwesterly extension to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 492.)
-------------------------------------------

10913.

The land and ocean waters within the following boundaries constitute the City of Encinitas Marine Life Refuge:

All those submerged lands lying between the mean high tide line in the City of Encinitas, County of San Diego, State of California, and a line which is 600 feet westerly of and parallel and concentric with that mean high tide line and lying southerly of the westerly prolongation of the northerly right-of-way line of “D” Street as shown on Map No. 148, in the City of Encinitas, County of San Diego, State of California, filed in the office of the County Recorder of San Diego County, and lying northerly of the following described line:

Beginning at the southeasterly corner of Lot N in Block 3 of Resubdivision of Sea Cliff Villa, in the City of Encinitas, County of San Diego, State of California, filed in the San Diego County Recorder’s office, December 10, 1914; thence southwesterly along the southwesterly prolongation of the southeasterly line of said Lot N, South 36°36´30″ west, to a point on that line which is 600 feet westerly of and parallel and concentric with the mean high tide line.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Junior Fishing Reserve [10925. - 10925.]

10925.

(a) In that part of District 112 comprising the waters of Francis Creek, Rees Creek, and Williams Creek, and in that part of District 138 comprising the waters of the Sawmill Pond, it is unlawful for any person over the age of 14 to take any fish. Not more than five fish may be taken and possessed from those waters during one day.

(b) It is the purpose of this section to create a junior fishing reserve for young people so that they may practice the art of angling safely without interference with, or being interfered with by, licensed sporting fishermen and others during lawful fishing seasons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Burro Sanctuary [10930. - 10932.]

10930.

The following is a burro sanctuary: All that area within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the point at which the northern boundary line of Death Valley National Monument intersects with the easterly boundary line of the State of California;

Thence westerly along the northern boundary line of Death Valley National Monument to the point of intersection with the line common to R. 40 and 41 E., Mount Diablo Meridian, being the NE. corner of Sec. 24, T. 10 S., R. 40 E., M. D. B. & M.;

Thence northerly along the line common to R. 40 and 41 E., M. D. M., to the point of intersection with the line common to T. 9 and 10 S., Mount Diablo Base, being the NE. corner of Sec. 1, T. 10 S., R. 40 E., M. D. B. & M.;

Thence westerly along the line common to T. 9 and 10 S., M.D.B., and the prolongation thereof, to the point of intersection with the most easterly boundary line of the Inyo National Forest, as such boundary exists on the effective date of this act, being the NW. corner of Sec. 6, T. 10 S., R. 37 E., M. D. B. & M.;

Thence southerly and easterly along the most easterly boundary line of the Inyo National Forest to the most easterly southeast corner of said national forest; 

Thence in a direct line in a generally southeasterly direction to the point at which the center line of State Highway Route 127 (No. 190) intersects with the line common to R. 41 and 42 E., M. D. M.;

Thence southerly along the line common to R. 41 and 42 E., M. D. M., to the point of intersection with the line common to T. 20 and 21 S., M. D. B., being the SW. corner of Sec. 31, T. 20 S., R. 42 E., M. D. B. & M.;

Thence westerly one-half mile, more or less, along the line common to T. 20 and 21 S., M. D. B., to the point of intersection with the line common to R. 41 and 42 E., M. D. M., being the NW. corner of Sec. 6, T. 21 S., R. 42 E., M. D. B. & M.;

Thence southerly along the line common to R. 41 and 42 E., M. D. M., to the point of intersection with the boundary line between Inyo and San Bernardino Counties;

Thence easterly along said county boundary line to the point of intersection with the easterly boundary line of the State of California;

Thence northwesterly along said easterly boundary line of the State to the point of beginning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 867.)
-------------------------------------------

10931.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4600) of Part 3, Division 4 of this code it is unlawful to take, possess, harm, molest, harass, or in any manner interfere with any burro which is in the burro sanctuary described in Section 10930 of this code. Any violation of these provisions is a misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section, other than those relating to the taking and possession of burros, do not apply to persons while lawfully on lands included within the sanctuary and engaged in the business of raising cattle.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19031 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 596.)
-------------------------------------------

10932.

The following constitutes a marine life refuge and shall be designated the Catalina Marine Science Center Marine Life Refuge:

All that area bounded on the south and southeast by the mean high tide line and by the present seaward boundary of the lease to tide and submerged lands now held by the University of Southern California from the State Lands Commission (No. 3692.1 Public Resources Code Series) and extending from a point on the mean high tide line at 33° 26´ 39″ North Latitude 118° 29´ 19″ West Longitude, thence to 33° 26´ 50″ North Latitude 118° 29´ 08″ West Longitude, thence to 33° 26´ 57.5″ North Latitude 118° 28´ 33.5″ West Longitude, thence to 33° 26´ 55″ North Latitude 118° 28´ 32″ West Longitude, and thence to a point on the mean high tide line at 33° 26´ 53.5″ North Latitude 118° 28´ 35″ West Longitude.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 682, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. DISTRICTS [11000. - 11039.]



CHAPTER 1. Boundaries [11000. - 11039.]

11000.

For the protection of fish and game, the State of California is divided into fish and game districts to be known and designated as provided in this division.

Unless otherwise provided, the townships and ranges specified in this division are referred to the Mount Diablo base and meridian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 1:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: Shasta, Tehama, Plumas, Butte, Sierra, Sutter, Yuba, Nevada, Placer, Sacramento, Madera, Tulare; those portions of San Joaquin County lying east and north of the east bank of the San Joaquin River and not included in District 3; those portions of Stanislaus and Merced Counties lying east of the west bank of the San Joaquin River; those portions of Fresno County lying east of the west bank of Fresno Slough, Fish Slough and Summit Lake; those portions of Kings County lying east of the main power line of the San
 Joaquin Light and Power Company, crossing the north line of Kings County in Section 4, T. 18 S., R. 19 E., southerly to its crossing of State Highway No. 41 between Secs. 21 and 22, T. 21 S., R. 19 E., and east of State Highway No. 41 southerly to its intersection with State Highway No. 33, and easterly of State Highway No. 33 from said intersection to the south line of said county in Section 36, T. 24 S., R. 18 E.; those portions of Kern County lying east of State Highway No. 33 between the northerly line of said county in Section one (1), T. 25 S., R. 18 E., M. D. B. & M., and the City of Taft and U. S. Highway No. 399 between the City of Taft and the City of Maricopa, and lying north of State Highway No. 166 from the City of Maricopa easterly to the intersection of said highway with U.S. Highway No. 99 in Section twelve (12), T. 11 N., R. 20 W., S. B. B. & M., and lying east of U.S. Highway No. 99 from the above-mentioned point of intersection to where the said U.S. highway crosses the northern
 boundary line of Los Angeles County, not included in other districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 138:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: Alpine, El Dorado, Amador, Calaveras, Tuolumne and Mariposa.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the provisions of this code relating to District 1 shall apply to District 138.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 112:

Those portions of the Counties of Del Norte, Siskiyou, Trinity, and Humboldt not included in other districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 134:

Those portions of the County of Modoc not included in other districts and that portion of the County of Siskiyou lying east of the Weed-Klamath Falls Highway between the north line of the County of Siskiyou and the Town of Weed and east of the Pacific Highway between the Town of Weed and the junction of Pacific Highway and the McCloud-Fall River Mills Highway and north and east of the McCloud-Fall River Mills Highway to the Siskiyou and Shasta county line and that part of Shasta
 County lying north and east of the McCloud-Fall River Mills Highway to its junction with the road to Lake Britton at Dickson Flat and east of that road through Burney Falls State Park to its junction with the Hat Creek-Lassen Highway at the Redding-Alturas Highway and east of the Hat Creek-Lassen Highway to Lassen Volcanic National Park and north and east to the north and east boundary of Lassen Volcanic National Park to its junction with the Lassen county line. That part of Lassen County north and east of the north and east boundary of the Lassen Volcanic National Park to its junction with the north line of District 25 and east of the east boundary of District 25 to its junction with the Lassen-Plumas county line approximately one mile southeast of Coyote Peak in Sec. 24, T. 28 N., R. 10 E. and north and west of the Plumas-Lassen county line between the boundary of District 25 and the Susanville-Taylorsville road.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 2:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: Mendocino, Glenn, Colusa, Yolo, Solano, Napa, Sonoma, and Marin; that portion of San Francisco Bay lying westerly of a line drawn from California Point to San Quentin Point; that portion of San Francisco Bay lying westerly of a line drawn from San Quentin Point to San Pedro Point, in Marin County; that portion of San Pablo Bay lying westerly of a line drawn from San Pedro Point to the south side of the mouth of Novato Creek; and that portion of San Pablo Bay lying northerly of a line drawn due east from the
 south side of the mouth of Novato Creek to the westerly shore of Mare Island.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11006.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 214:

Lake County and the waters of Clear Lake.

Any reference in this code to Clear Lake refers to District 214.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the provisions of this code relating to District 2 apply to District
 214.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11007.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 212:

Those portions of T. 24 N., R. 18 and 19 W.; 23 N., R. 17 and 18 W.; 22 N., R. 17 and 18 W.; 21 N., R. 17 W., west of the summit of the divide between the Pacific Ocean and the south fork of the Eel River.

All of T. 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18 N., R. 16 W.; and T. 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19 and 20 N., R. 17 W., and T. 17 and 18 N., R. 18 W.

All being townships located in western Mendocino
 County.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 3:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: San Francisco, Contra Costa, Alameda, San Mateo, Santa Cruz, Santa Clara, San Benito, Monterey, San Joaquin, Stanislaus, Merced, Fresno, and Kings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11009.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 312:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, Ventura, and Kern.

Except as otherwise provided all of the provisions of this code applicable to District 3 apply to District 312.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11010.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 4:

Those portions of the following counties not included in other districts: San Bernardino, Riverside, and Orange.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11011.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 418:

All of Los Angeles County not included within other districts.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the provisions of this code applicable to District 4 apply to District 418.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11012.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 412:

Those portions of the Counties of Mono and Inyo not included in other districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11013.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 434:

Those portions of the Counties of San Diego and Imperial not included in other districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11014.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 6:

The ocean waters and tidelands of the State to the high-water mark lying between the northern boundary of this State and a line extending due west from the west end of the north jetty at the entrance of Humboldt Bay, excluding all sloughs, streams, and lagoons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11015.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 7:

The ocean waters and tidelands of the State to high-water mark between a line extending due west from the west end of the north jetty at the entrance of Humboldt Bay and the southern boundary of Mendocino County, excluding the ocean waters between the north and south jetties at the entrance of Humboldt Bay from the westerly end of each of said jetties in the Pacific Ocean to their respective aprons on the shores of Humboldt Bay, and also excluding all sloughs, streams, and lagoons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11016.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 8:

The waters and tidelands to high-water mark of Humboldt Bay lying north of a straight line running east from the center of apron at the approach of the south jetty at the entrance of Humboldt Bay to the east shore line of the bay including the entrance of Humboldt Bay not included in District 7, and excluding all rivers, streams, and sloughs emptying into the bay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11017.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 9:

The waters and tidelands to high-water mark of Humboldt Bay lying south of a straight line running east from the center of apron at the approach to the south jetty at the entrance of Humboldt Bay to the east shore line of the bay, excluding all rivers, streams, and sloughs emptying into the bay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11018.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 10:

The ocean waters and the tidelands of the state to high-water mark lying between the southern boundary of Mendocino County and a line extending west from the Pigeon Point lighthouse in San Mateo County, including the waters of Tomales Bay to a line drawn from the mouth of the unnamed creek approximately 1500 feet north of Tomasini Point southwesterly 218° magnetic to the mouth of the unnamed creek at Shell Beach, and excluding Bodega Lagoon and all that portion of Bolinas Bay lying inside of Bolinas bar, that portion of San Francisco Bay lying east of a line drawn from Point Bonita to Point Lobos and all rivers, streams, and lagoons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 208.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11019.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 11:

The waters and tidelands of San Francisco Bay to high-water mark bounded as follows: Beginning at the extreme westerly point of Point Bonita; thence in a direct line to the extreme westerly point of Point Lobos; thence around the shore line of San Francisco Bay to the foot of Powell Street; thence in a direct line northwesterly to Peninsula Point, the most southerly extremity of Belvedere Island; thence in a direct line westerly to the easternmost point of the ferry
 dock at Sausalito; thence southerly and westerly around the shore of San Francisco Bay to the point of beginning.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11020.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 12:

The waters and tidelands of San Francisco Bay to high-water mark not included in Districts 11 and 13, the waters and tidelands to high-water mark of San Leandro Bay, Oakland Creek or estuary, San Antonio Creek in Alameda County, Raccoon Strait, San Pablo Bay, the Carquinez Strait to the Carquinez Bridge, and all lands and waters included within the exterior boundaries of these districts and excluding all tributary sloughs, creeks, bays, rivers, and overflowed areas not specifically described herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 103.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11022.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 13:

The waters and tidelands to high-water mark of San Francisco Bay lying to the south of a line drawn between the Ferry Building at the foot of Market Street in San Francisco and the mouth of the Oakland Creek or estuary in Alameda County, excluding all streams, sloughs, and lagoons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11024.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 16:

The waters and tidelands to high-water mark of that portion of Monterey Bay lying to the south of a line drawn 100° magnetic from the extreme northerly point of Point Pinos in a straight line easterly to the eastern shore of Monterey Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

11025.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 17:

The waters and tidelands to high-water mark of Monterey Bay and the Pacific Ocean, lying between a line extending west from Pigeon Point Lighthouse and a line extending west from Yankee Point, Carmel Highlands in Monterey County, excluding the areas included in District 16, and excluding all rivers, creeks, sloughs and lagoons emptying into the Pacific Ocean and Monterey Bay within the boundaries thus defined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1009, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

11026.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 18:

The ocean waters of the State and tidelands to high-water mark not included in other districts, lying between a line extending due west from Yankee Point, Carmel Highlands, in Monterey County, and a line extending from Point Rincon near or at the common boundaries between Santa Barbara and Ventura Counties westerly through Richardson Rock, and excluding all rivers, streams, sloughs, and lagoons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11027.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 19:

The ocean waters of the State and tidelands to high-water mark, and islands off the coast and waters adjacent thereto, lying southerly of Fish and Game District 18, and northerly of a westerly extension of the boundary line between the Republic of Mexico and San Diego County, excepting Districts 19A, 19B, 20, 20A, and 21, and excluding all rivers, streams, sloughs, lagoons, and bays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------

11028.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 19A:

The ocean waters and tidelands to high-water mark lying between the southerly extremity of Malibu Point and the westerly extremity of Rocky Point (Palos Verdes Point), excluding all rivers, streams and lagoons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11029.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 19B:

The ocean waters and tidelands to high-water mark northerly of the following line:

Beginning at the west end of the San Pedro Breakwater, thence in an extended line following the axis of said San Pedro Breakwater, the middle breakwater and the Long Beach Breakwater to the east end of the latter, thence to the outer end of the west jetty of Anaheim Bay.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the provisions of this code applicable to Districts 4 and
 418 apply to District 19B.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 617.)
-------------------------------------------

11030.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 20:

Santa Catalina Island and the portion of the state waters within three nautical miles of the island’s coast line on the northerly, easterly, and southerly side of the island, lying between a line extending three nautical miles west magnetically from the extreme westerly end of Santa Catalina Island to a line extending three nautical miles southwest magnetically from the most southerly promontory of China Point.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11031.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 20A:

The waters lying around Santa Catalina Island, within three nautical miles of the coast line of the island, which are not included in District 20.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11032.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 21:

The waters and tidelands to high water mark of San Diego Bay lying inside of a straight line drawn from the southerly extremity of Point Loma to the offshore end of the San Diego breakwater.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 104.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

11033.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 22:

All of Imperial County and those portions of Riverside and San Bernardino Counties lying south and east of the following line: Starting at the intersection of Highway 99 with the north boundary of Imperial County, thence north along that highway to the intersection with Highway 60 and 70; thence east along Highway 60 and 70 to its intersection with the Cottonwood Springs Road in Sec. 9, T. 6 S., R. 11 E.; thence north along that road and the Mecca Dale Road to Amboy; thence east along Highway 66 to the intersection with Highway 95; thence north along Highway 95 to the
 California-Nevada boundary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11034.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 23:

The lands and waters lying within the drainage area of Rubicon and Little Rubicon Rivers above their confluence in Sec. 13, T. 13 N., R. 13 E.; all lands and waters lying within the drainage area of the South Fork of the American River and all its tributaries above Chili Bar Bridge on the Placerville-Georget own Highway; all of the lands and waters lying within the drainage area of Webber Creek above the Mother Lode Highway between El Dorado and Placerville; the waters of Lake Tahoe and the Truckee River, and all streams flowing into that lake and river, and all lands and waters
 within the drainage basin of that lake and river lying within this State; the waters of Silver Lake, Twin Lakes, Twin Lake, Blue Lakes, Meadow Lake, Wood Lake, Winnemucca Lake and Scott’s Lake, Burnside Lake, the Carson River, the West Fork of the Carson River, Willow Creek and Markleeville Creek and all tributaries of those streams and all streams flowing into those lakes and all lands and waters lying within the drainage basin of those lakes, rivers and streams within this State; all the waters of the Cosumnes River and its tributaries, and all lakes lying within the watershed of that river and tributaries above the bridge on the Mother Lode Highway between Plymouth and Nashville, all being within the Counties of Alpine, Amador, and El Dorado.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11035.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 25:

The waters of Lake Almanor and all streams flowing into that lake and all lands lying within the drainage basin of those streams and lake, all being within the Counties of Plumas and Lassen.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11036.

The following constitutes the Klamath River Fish and Game District:

The waters of the Klamath River as described in the initiative act to create the Klamath River Fish and Game District, approved by the electors on November 4, 1924, which initiative act provides:

The Klamath River Fish and Game District is hereby created and shall consist of the Klamath River and the waters thereof, following its meanderings from the confluence of the Klamath River and the Shasta River in the County of Siskiyou to the mouth of the Klamath River in Del Norte
 County.

Every person, firm, corporation or company who constructs or maintains any dam or other artificial obstruction in any of the waters of said Klamath River Fish and Game District is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction must be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned in the county jail of the county in which the conviction shall be had, not less than 100 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and any artificial obstruction constructed, placed or maintained in said district is hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 101.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

11037.

The following constitutes the Trinity and Klamath River Fish and Game District:

The Klamath River and the waters thereof, following its meanderings from the mouth of the Klamath River in Del Norte County to its confluence with the Salmon River, and also the Trinity River and the waters thereof, following its meanderings from its confluence with the Klamath River in the County of Humboldt to its confluence with the south fork of the said Trinity River.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

11038.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 118:

The ocean waters and tidelands lying within the following boundaries:

Beginning at the south side of the pier at San Simeon thence westerly three miles, thence southerly to a point three miles west of the southern boundary of the state park at Cambria in San Luis Obispo County, thence easterly to the southwest point of the state park at Cambria.

All of the provisions relating to District 18 shall apply to District 118.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1014, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

11039.

The following constitutes Fish and Game District 118.5:

The ocean and tidelands to high-water mark, not included in other districts, excluding all rivers, streams, sloughs, and lagoons, bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the common boundary of Monterey and San Luis Obispo Counties with the mean high-water mark, thence due west two miles to a point, thence by a line following the coast line and parallel to it southerly to a point two miles south of the intersection of the common boundary of Santa Barbara and Ventura Counties with the mean high-water mark, thence north to the intersection of the common boundary of Santa
 Barbara and Ventura Counties with the mean high-water mark.

Except as otherwise provided, all of the provisions relating to District 18 shall apply to District 118.5.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 9. FINES AND PENALTIES [12000. - 12300.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [12000. - 12029.]

12000.

(a) Except as expressly provided otherwise in this code, any violation of this code, or of any rule, regulation, or order made or adopted under this code, is a misdemeanor.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person who violates any of the following statutes or regulations is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or of a misdemeanor:

(1) Section 2009.

(2) Section 2353.

(3) Sections 5508
 and 5509.

(4) Section 5652.

(5) Subdivision (a) of Section 6596.1.

(6) Section 7149.8.

(7) Sections 7850, 7852.27, 7856, 7857, 7880, 7881, 7920, 7923, 8026, 8030 to 8036, inclusive, 8043 to 8050, inclusive, 8257, 9001, 9003, and 9004.

(8) Sections 1.14, 1.17, 1.62, 1.63, and 1.74 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(9) Sections 2.00 to 5.95, inclusive, and 7.00 to
 8.00, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(10) Sections 27.56 to 30.10, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(11) Sections 40 to 43, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(12) Sections 90, 91, 107, 123, 132.1, 176, 180, 180.2, 180.4, 180.5, 180.6, 182, 189, 190, 195, and 197 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(13) Subdivision (e) of Section 150.16 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(14) Section 251.7 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(15) Sections 307, 308, and 311 to 313, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(16) Sections 505, 507 to 510, inclusive, and 550 to 552, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(17) Section 630 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(18) Section 632 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, except if either of the following apply:

(A) The person who violates the regulation holds a commercial fishing license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 7850) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 or the person who violates the regulation is operating a boat or vessel licensed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 7920) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 6 at the time of the violation. Except as provided in Section 12012.5, a person
 described in this subparagraph who violates Section 632 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable pursuant to Section 12002.

(B) The violation of the regulation occurred within two years of a prior violation of the regulation that resulted in a conviction.

(19) Section 650 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 129, Sec. 2.   (AB 1611)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.

Any person who takes any bird or mammal in violation of an order issued pursuant to Section 12150 of this code, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2210.)
-------------------------------------------

12001.5.

(a) In addition to any other penalty or fine imposed pursuant to this code, if a person has been convicted of one or more offenses that was a violation of a section listed in subdivision (b) separate from the offense before the court, the court may order as a condition of probation upon conviction of the offense before the court that is also a violation of a section listed in subdivision (b), that the person attend the hunter education course designated in Section 3051 and perform community service, preferably relating to natural resources if that type of community service is available, as follows:

(1) If the person has one separate conviction, not more than 200 hours of community service.

(2) If the person has two or more separate convictions, not more than 300 hours of community service.

(b) This section applies to violations relating to a taking in Sections 3007, 3700.1, 4330, and 4750, and a sale or purchase of parts of a bear in Section 4758.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 209.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

(a) Unless otherwise provided, the punishment for a violation of this code that is a misdemeanor is a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) The punishment for a violation of any of the following provisions is a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment:

(1) Section 1059.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 4004.

(3) Section 4600.

(4) Paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5650.

(5) A first violation of Section 8670.

(6) Section 10500.

(7) Unless a greater punishment is otherwise provided, a violation subject to subdivision (a) of Section 12003.1.

(c) Except as specified in Sections 12001 and 12010, the punishment for violation of Section 3503, 3503.5, 3513, or 3800 is a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) (1) A license, tag, stamp, reservation, permit, or other entitlement or privilege issued
 pursuant to this code to a defendant who fails to appear at a court hearing for a violation of this code, or who fails to pay a fine imposed pursuant to this code, shall be immediately suspended or revoked. The license, tag, stamp, reservation, permit, or other entitlement or privilege shall not be reinstated or renewed, and no other license, tag, stamp, reservation, permit, or other entitlement or privilege shall be issued to that person pursuant to this code, until the court proceeding is completed or the fine is paid.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to any violation of Section 1052, 1059, 1170, 5650, 6454, 6650, or 6653.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 210.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 12002, the punishment for taking a mammal or bird for which a hunting license issued pursuant to Section 3031 is required or a tag, seal, or stamp is required, including a deer tag issued pursuant to Section 3407, without having in one’s possession the required valid license, or without having in one’s possession any required tag, seal, or stamp, or when the taking of that mammal or bird is prohibited by allowable season, limit, time, or area, is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by any greater punishment prescribed by this code.

(b) If a person is charged with an offense described in subdivision (a) and produces in court a license, tag, seal, or stamp, issued to the person and valid at the time of the person’s arrest and if the taking was otherwise lawful with respect to season, limit, time, and area, the court may reduce the charge to an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 294, Sec. 27.   (AB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.2.
